Missouri, session 2026, HB3154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 313, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 313.912 and 313.1000, to read as follows:
313.912. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri gaming commission;
(2) "Fantasy sports contest operator", a sole proprietorship, corporation,
partnership, limited liability company, or a division thereof that is engaged in the
business of professionally conducting paid fantasy sports contests, as defined under
section 313.905, for cash or other prizes or awards for members of the general public
that requires cash or cash equivalent as an entry fee to be paid by a member of the
general public.
2. The commission may require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
an application for a fantasy sports contest operator license by any employees, officers,
or directors of a fantasy sports contest operator.
3. If the commission requires that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
such application, the commission shall require applicants to submit fingerprints to the
Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of conducting a state and federal
fingerprint-based criminal history background check.
4. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state
highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the
state criminal records repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3154 2
Investigation for a federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The Missouri
state highway patrol shall notify the commission of any criminal history record
information or lack of criminal history record information discovered on the individual.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all records related to
any criminal history information discovered shall be accessible and available to the
commission.
313.1000. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri gaming commission;
(2) "Excursion gambling boat", the same meaning as such term is defined under
section 313.800;
(3) "Mobile sports wagering license", a license granted by the Missouri gaming
commission authorizing the licensee to offer sports wagering through an online sports
wagering platform to individuals physically located in this state;
(4) "Retail sports wagering license", a license granted by the Missouri gaming
commission authorizing the licensee to offer sports wagering in person to individuals at
excursion gambling boats or at any location within each sports district, as approved by
each applicable professional sports team that plays its home games in such sports
district;
(5) "Sports district", the premises of a facility located in this state with a
capacity of eleven thousand five hundred people or more, at which one or more
professional sports teams play their home games, and the surrounding area within four
hundred yards of such premises.
2. The commission may require that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
an application for a retail sports wagering license or mobile sports wagering license.
3. If the commission requires that fingerprint submissions be made as part of
such application, the commission shall require applicants to submit fingerprints to the
Missouri state highway patrol for the purpose of conducting a state and federal
fingerprint-based criminal history background check.
4. The fingerprints and any required fees shall be sent to the Missouri state
highway patrol's central repository. The fingerprints shall be used for searching the
state criminal records repository and shall also be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a federal criminal records search under section 43.540. The Missouri
state highway patrol shall notify the commission of any criminal history record
information or lack of criminal history record information discovered on the individual.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.120 to the contrary, all records related to

HCS HB 3154 3
any criminal history information discovered shall be accessible and available to the
commission.
✔